Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-806
Attorney General; powers; violation; how treated.

(1) For purposes of the Financial Data Protection and Consumer Notification of Data Security Breach Act of 2006, the Attorney General may issue subpoenas and seek and recover direct economic damages for each affected Nebraska resident injured by a violation of section 87-803.

(2) A violation of section 87-808 shall be considered a violation of section 59-1602 and be subject to the Consumer Protection Act and any other law which provides for the implementation and enforcement of section 59-1602. A violation of section 87-808 does not give rise to a private cause of action.

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB757, § 8.

Consumer Protection Act, see section 59-1623.